Utah statutes.
17-33-15.   Duty of county legislative body to provide rules or regulations -- Conflicts with state or federal law.

(1)  It shall be the duty of the county legislative body to provide by rule or regulation for the operation and functioning of any activity within the purpose and spirit of the act which is necessary and expedient.

(2)  If any provision of this act or the application thereof is found to be in conflict with any state or federal law, conflict with which would impair funding otherwise receivable from the state or federal government, the conflicting part is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the department, agency, or institution of the county directly affected, but such finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in any of its applications.

(3)  Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no rule or regulation shall be adopted by the county legislative body which would deprive the county or any of its departments, agencies, or institutions of state or federal grants or other forms of financial assistance.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

